District of Columbia statutes.
16-1313

Selection of jury; oath of jurors.

In each action brought pursuant to this subchapter, the court shall appoint, from among the persons whose names are drawn pursuant to section 16-1312 , a jury of five capable and disinterested persons, and shall administer to the persons so drawn an oath or affirmation that they:

(1)

are not interested in any manner in the real property to be condemned;

(2)

are not related to the parties interested in the property; and

(3)

without favor or partiality, and to the best of their judgment, will appraise the value of the respective interests of all persons concerned in the property.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1313.
1973 Ed., § 16-1313.